California statutes. Penal Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 76, Sec. 29.   (AB 1621)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30420.

This article does not apply to any of the following persons:

 (a) A member of the Armed Forces of the United States or the National Guard, while on duty and acting within the scope and course of employment, or any law enforcement agency or forensic laboratory.

(b) A common carrier licensed under state law, or a motor carrier, air carrier or carrier affiliated with an air carrier through common controlling interest that is subject to Title 49 of the United States Code, or an authorized agent of any such carrier, when acting in the course and scope of duties incident to the receipt, processing, transportation, or delivery of property.

(c) An authorized representative of a city, county, city and county, or state or federal government that receives an unserialized firearm precursor part as part of an authorized, voluntary program in which the governmental entity is buying or receiving firearms or firearm precursor parts from private individuals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 76, Sec. 34.   (AB 1621)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

30425.

This article does not prohibit the manufacture of firearm precursor parts under contracts approved by agencies of the state or federal government.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 730, Sec. 6.   (AB 879)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Assault Weapons and .50 BMG Rifles [30500. - 31115.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [30500. - 30530.]

30500.

This chapter shall be known as the Roberti-Roos Assault Weapons Control Act of 1989 and the .50 Caliber BMG Regulation Act of 2004.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30505.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the proliferation and use of assault weapons poses a threat to the health, safety, and security of all citizens of this state. The Legislature has restricted the assault weapons specified in Section 30510 based upon finding that each firearm has such a high rate of fire and capacity for firepower that its function as a legitimate sports or recreational firearm is substantially outweighed by the danger that it can be used to kill and injure human beings. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to place restrictions on the use of assault weapons and to establish a registration and permit procedure for their lawful sale and possession. It is not, however, the intent of the Legislature by
 this chapter to place restrictions on the use of those weapons which are primarily designed and intended for hunting, target practice, or other legitimate sports or recreational activities.

(b) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the proliferation and use of .50 BMG rifles poses a clear and present terrorist threat to the health, safety, and security of all residents of, and visitors to, this state, based upon findings that those firearms have such a high capacity for long distance and highly destructive firepower that they pose an unacceptable risk to the death and serious injury of human beings, destruction or serious damage of vital public and private buildings, civilian, police and military vehicles, power generation and transmission facilities, petrochemical production and storage facilities, and transportation infrastructure. It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to place restrictions on the use of these
 rifles and to establish a registration and permit procedure for their lawful sale and possession.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30510.

As used in this chapter and in Sections 16780, 17000, 27555, 27560, 27565, 27875, 27920, 27966, and 28000, “assault weapon” means the following designated semiautomatic firearms:

(a) All of the following specified rifles:

(1) All AK series including, but not limited to, the models identified as follows:

(A) Made in China AK, AKM, AKS, AK47, AK47S, 56, 56S, 84S, and 86S.

(B) Norinco 56, 56S, 84S, and 86S.

(C) Poly Technologies AKS and AK47.

(D) MAADI AK47 and ARM.

(2) UZI and Galil.

(3) Beretta AR-70.

(4) CETME Sporter.

(5) Colt AR-15 series.

(6) Daewoo K-1, K-2, Max 1, Max 2, AR 100, and AR 110C.

(7) Fabrique Nationale FAL, LAR, FNC, 308 Match, and Sporter.

(8) MAS 223.

(9) HK-91, HK-93,
 HK-94, and HK-PSG-1.

(10) The following MAC types:

(A) RPB Industries Inc. sM10 and sM11.

(B) SWD Incorporated M11.

(11) SKS with detachable magazine.

(12) SIG AMT, PE-57, SG 550, and SG 551.

(13) Springfield Armory BM59 and SAR-48.

(14) Sterling MK-6.

(15) Steyr AUG.

(16) Valmet M62S, M71S, and M78S.

(17) Armalite AR-180.

(18) Bushmaster Assault Rifle.

(19) Calico M-900.

(20) J&R ENG M-68.

(21) Weaver Arms Nighthawk.

(b) All of the following specified pistols:

(1) UZI.

(2) Encom MP-9 and MP-45.

(3) The following MAC types:

(A) RPB Industries Inc. sM10 and sM11.

(B) SWD Incorporated M-11.

(C) Advance Armament Inc. M-11.

(D) Military Armament Corp. Ingram M-11.

(4) Intratec TEC-9.

(5) Sites Spectre.

(6) Sterling MK-7.

(7) Calico M-950.

(8) Bushmaster Pistol.

(c) All of the following specified shotguns:

(1) Franchi SPAS 12 and LAW 12.

(2) Striker 12.

(3) The Streetsweeper type S/S Inc. SS/12.

(d) Any firearm declared to be an assault weapon by the court pursuant to former Section 12276.5, as it read in Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989, Section 1 of Chapter 874 of the Statutes of 1990, or Section 3 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991, which is specified as an assault weapon in a list promulgated pursuant to former Section 12276.5, as it read in Section 3 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991.

(e) This section is declaratory of existing law and a clarification of the law and the
 Legislature’s intent which bans the weapons enumerated in this section, the weapons included in the list promulgated by the Attorney General pursuant to former Section 12276.5, as it read in Section 3 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991, and any other models that are only variations of those weapons with minor differences, regardless of the manufacturer. The Legislature has defined assault weapons as the types, series, and models listed in this section because it was the most effective way to identify and restrict a specific class of semiautomatic weapons.

(f) As used in this section, “series” includes all other models that are only variations, with minor differences, of those models listed in subdivision (a), regardless of the manufacturer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 540, Sec. 15.   (AB 3064)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

30515.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 30510, “assault weapon” also means any of the following:

(1) A semiautomatic, centerfire rifle that does not have a fixed magazine but has any one of the following:

(A) A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon.

(B) A thumbhole stock.

(C) A folding or telescoping stock.

(D) A grenade launcher or flare launcher.

(E) A flash suppressor.

(F) A forward pistol grip.

(2) A semiautomatic, centerfire rifle that has a fixed magazine with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds.

(3) A semiautomatic, centerfire rifle that has an overall length of less than 30 inches.

(4) A semiautomatic pistol that does not have a fixed magazine but has any one of the following:

(A) A threaded barrel, capable of accepting a flash suppressor, forward handgrip, or silencer.

(B) A second handgrip.

(C) A shroud that is attached to, or partially or completely encircles, the barrel that allows the bearer to fire the weapon
 without burning the bearer’s hand, except a slide that encloses the barrel.

(D) The capacity to accept a detachable magazine at some location outside of the pistol grip.

(5) A semiautomatic pistol with a fixed magazine that has the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds.

(6) A semiautomatic shotgun that has both of the following:

(A) A folding or telescoping stock.

(B) A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon, thumbhole stock, or vertical handgrip.

(7) A semiautomatic shotgun that does not have a fixed magazine.

(8) Any shotgun
 with a revolving cylinder.

(9) A semiautomatic centerfire firearm that is not a rifle, pistol, or shotgun, that does not have a fixed magazine, but that has any one of the following:

(A) A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon.

(B) A thumbhole stock.

(C) A folding or telescoping stock.

(D) A grenade launcher or flare launcher.

(E) A flash suppressor.

(F) A forward pistol grip.

(G) A threaded barrel, capable of accepting a flash suppressor, forward handgrip, or
 silencer.

(H) A second handgrip.

(I) A shroud that is attached to, or partially or completely encircles, the barrel that allows the bearer to fire the weapon without burning the bearer’s hand, except a slide that encloses the barrel.

(J) The capacity to accept a detachable magazine at some location outside of the pistol grip.

(10) A semiautomatic centerfire firearm that is not a rifle, pistol, or shotgun, that has a fixed magazine with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds.

(11) A semiautomatic centerfire firearm that is not a rifle, pistol, or shotgun, that has an overall length of less than 30 inches.

(b) For purposes
 of this section, “fixed magazine” means an ammunition feeding device contained in, or permanently attached to, a firearm in such a manner that the device cannot be removed without disassembly of the firearm action.

(c) The Legislature finds a significant public purpose in exempting from the definition of “assault weapon” pistols that are designed expressly for use in Olympic or Paralympic target shooting events. Therefore, those pistols that are sanctioned by the Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the Olympic and Paralympic Games 2028, the International Olympic
 Committee, the International Paralympic Committee, or by USA Shooting, the national governing body for international shooting competition in the United States, and that would otherwise fall within the definition of “assault weapon” pursuant to this section are exempt, as provided in subdivision (d).

(d) “Assault weapon” does not include either of the following:

(1) Any antique firearm.

(2) Any of the following pistols, because they are consistent with the significant public purpose expressed in subdivision (c):MANUFACTURERMODELCALIBERBENELLIMP90.22LRBENELLIMP90.32 S&W LONGBENELLIMP95.22LRBENELLIMP95.32 S&W LONGHAMMERLI280.22LRHAMMERLI280.32 S&W LONGHAMMERLISP20.22LRHAMMERLISP20.32 S&W LONGPARDINIGPO.22 SHORTPARDINIGP-SCHUMANN.22 SHORTPARDINIHP.32 S&W LONGPARDINIMP.32 S&W LONGPARDINISP.22LRPARDINISPE.22LRWALTHERGSP.22LRWALTHERGSP.32 S&W LONGWALTHEROSP.22 SHORTWALTHEROSP-2000.22 SHORT(3) The Department of Justice shall create a program that is consistent with the purposes stated in subdivision (c) to exempt new models of competitive pistols that would otherwise fall within the definition of “assault weapon” pursuant to this section from being classified as an assault weapon. The exempt competitive pistols may be based on recommendations by USA Shooting consistent with the regulations contained in the USA Shooting Official Rules or may be based on the recommendation or rules of any other organization that the department deems relevant.

(4) (A) By June 30, 2028, the Department of Justice shall supplement the list of exempted pistols described in paragraph (3) to exempt new models of pistols anticipated to be utilized in the 2028 Olympic or Paralympic Games.

(B) The department shall supplement the list of exempted pistols pursuant to subparagraph (A) in coordination with, and promptly after receipt of any sufficient recommendation from, the Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the Olympic and Paralympic Games 2028. The Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the Olympic and Paralympic Games 2028 shall provide any sufficient recommendations to the department by June 19, 2028.

(C) Neither subparagraph (A) nor subparagraph (B) divest the Department of Justice of its independent authority to evaluate or render a decision regarding any sufficient recommendation submitted by the Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the Olympic and Paralympic Games 2028. To the extent that it does not conflict with the other provisions of this section, a sufficient recommendation may be approved, and the list of exempted pistols described in paragraph (3) may be
 appropriately updated.

(5) For the purposes of paragraph (4), a sufficient recommendation shall include all of the following:

(A) Be signed and dated by either the chief executive officer or chief operating officer of the Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the Olympic and Paralympic Games 2028.

(B) Specify the make, model, and caliber of the pistol.

(C) Include a statement that the pistol is sanctioned by the Los Angeles Organizing Committee for the Olympic and Paralympic Games 2028, the International Olympic Committee, or the International Paralympic Committee for use in an Olympic or Paralympic target shooting competition.

(D) Include a statement that the pistol is or will be used for
 Olympic or Paralympic target shooting purposes.

(e) Regulations adopted to implement paragraphs (4) and (5) of subdivision (d) are emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code and shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health, safety, and welfare.

(f) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other
 provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 354, Sec. 6.   (AB 191)   Effective September 20, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 7 of Stats. 2026, Ch. 354.)
-------------------------------------------

30515.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 30510, “assault weapon” also means any of the following:

(1) A semiautomatic, centerfire rifle that does not have a fixed magazine but has any one of the following:

(A) A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon.

(B) A thumbhole stock.

(C) A folding or telescoping stock.

(D) A grenade launcher or flare launcher.

(E) A flash suppressor.

(F) A forward pistol grip.

(2) A semiautomatic, centerfire rifle that has a fixed magazine with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds.

(3) A semiautomatic, centerfire rifle that has an overall length of less than 30 inches.

(4) A semiautomatic pistol that does not have a fixed magazine but has any one of the following:

(A) A threaded barrel, capable of accepting a flash suppressor, forward handgrip, or silencer.

(B) A second handgrip.

(C) A shroud that is attached to, or partially or completely encircles, the barrel that allows the bearer to fire the weapon
 without burning the bearer’s hand, except a slide that encloses the barrel.

(D) The capacity to accept a detachable magazine at some location outside of the pistol grip.

(5) A semiautomatic pistol with a fixed magazine that has the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds.

(6) A semiautomatic shotgun that has both of the following:

(A) A folding or telescoping stock.

(B) A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon, thumbhole stock, or vertical handgrip.

(7) A semiautomatic shotgun that does not have a fixed magazine.

(8) Any shotgun
 with a revolving cylinder.

(9) A semiautomatic centerfire firearm that is not a rifle, pistol, or shotgun, that does not have a fixed magazine, but that has any one of the following:

(A) A pistol grip that protrudes conspicuously beneath the action of the weapon.

(B) A thumbhole stock.

(C) A folding or telescoping stock.

(D) A grenade launcher or flare launcher.

(E) A flash suppressor.

(F) A forward pistol grip.

(G) A threaded barrel, capable of accepting a flash suppressor, forward handgrip, or
 silencer.

(H) A second handgrip.

(I) A shroud that is attached to, or partially or completely encircles, the barrel that allows the bearer to fire the weapon without burning the bearer’s hand, except a slide that encloses the barrel.

(J) The capacity to accept a detachable magazine at some location outside of the pistol grip.

(10) A semiautomatic centerfire firearm that is not a rifle, pistol, or shotgun, that has a fixed magazine with the capacity to accept more than 10 rounds.

(11) A semiautomatic centerfire firearm that is not a rifle, pistol, or shotgun, that has an overall length of less than 30 inches.

(b) For purposes
 of this section, “fixed magazine” means an ammunition feeding device contained in, or permanently attached to, a firearm in such a manner that the device cannot be removed without disassembly of the firearm action.

(c) The Legislature finds a significant public purpose in exempting from the definition of “assault weapon” pistols that are designed expressly for use in Olympic or Paralympic target shooting events. Therefore, those pistols that are sanctioned by the International Olympic Committee, the International Paralympic Committee, or by USA Shooting, the national governing body for international shooting competition in the United States, and that would otherwise fall within the definition of “assault weapon” pursuant to this section are exempt, as provided in subdivision (d).

(d) “Assault weapon” does not include either of the following:

(1) Any antique firearm.

(2) Any of the following pistols, because they are consistent with the significant public purpose expressed in subdivision (c):MANUFACTURERMODELCALIBERBENELLIMP90.22LRBENELLIMP90.32 S&W LONGBENELLIMP95.22LRBENELLIMP95.32 S&W LONGHAMMERLI280.22LRHAMMERLI280.32 S&W LONGHAMMERLISP20.22LRHAMMERLISP20.32 S&W LONGPARDINIGPO.22 SHORTPARDINIGP-SCHUMANN.22 SHORTPARDINIHP.32 S&W LONGPARDINIMP.32 S&W LONGPARDINISP.22LRPARDINISPE.22LRWALTHERGSP.22LRWALTHERGSP.32 S&W LONGWALTHEROSP.22 SHORTWALTHEROSP-2000.22 SHORT(3) The Department of Justice shall create a program that is consistent with the purposes stated in subdivision (c) to exempt new models of competitive pistols that would otherwise fall within the definition of “assault weapon” pursuant to this section from being classified as an assault weapon. The exempt competitive pistols may be based on recommendations by USA Shooting consistent with the regulations contained in the USA Shooting Official Rules or may be based on the recommendation or rules of any other organization that the department deems relevant.

(e) The provisions of this section are severable. If any provision of this section or its
 application is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(f) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2029.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 6) and added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 354, Sec. 7.   (AB 191)   Effective September 20, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

30520.

(a) The Attorney General shall prepare a description for identification purposes, including a picture or diagram, of each assault weapon listed in Section 30510, and any firearm declared to be an assault weapon pursuant to former Section 12276.5, as it read in Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989, Section 1 of Chapter 874 of the Statutes of 1990, or Section 3 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991, and shall distribute the description to all law enforcement agencies responsible for enforcement of this chapter. Those law enforcement agencies shall make the description available to all agency personnel.

(b) (1) Until January 1, 2007, the Attorney General shall
 promulgate a list that specifies all firearms designated as assault weapons in former Section 12276, as it read in Section 2 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991, Section 134 of Chapter 427 of the Statutes of 1992, or Section 19 of Chapter 606 of the Statutes of 1993, or declared to be assault weapons pursuant to former Section 12276.5, as it read in Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989, Section 1 of Chapter 874 of the Statutes of 1990, or Section 3 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991. The Attorney General shall file that list with the Secretary of State for publication in the California Code of Regulations. Any declaration that a specified firearm is an assault weapon shall be implemented by the Attorney General who, within 90 days, shall promulgate an amended list which shall include the specified firearm declared to be an assault weapon. The Attorney General shall file the amended list with the Secretary of State for publication in the California Code of Regulations. Any firearm declared
 to be an assault weapon prior to January 1, 2007, shall remain on the list filed with the Secretary of State.

(2) Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, pertaining to the adoption of rules and regulations, shall not apply to any list of assault weapons promulgated pursuant to this section.

(c) The Attorney General shall adopt those rules and regulations that may be necessary or proper to carry out the purposes and intent of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30525.

As used in this part, “.50 BMG cartridge” means a cartridge that is designed and intended to be fired from a center fire rifle and that meets all of the following criteria:

(a) It has an overall length of 5.54 inches from the base to the tip of the bullet.

(b) The bullet diameter for the cartridge is from .510 to, and including, .511 inch.

(c) The case base diameter for the cartridge is from .800 inch to, and including, .804 inch.

(d) The cartridge case length is 3.91 inches.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30530.

(a) As used in this part, “.50 BMG rifle” means a center fire rifle that can fire a .50 BMG cartridge and is not already an assault weapon or a machinegun.

(b) A “.50 BMG rifle” does not include any antique firearm, nor any curio or relic as defined in Section 478.11 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Unlawful Acts Relating to Assault Weapons and .50 BMG Rifles  [30600. - 30685.]

30600.

(a) Any person who, within this state, manufactures or causes to be manufactured, distributes, transports, or imports into the state, keeps for sale, or offers or exposes for sale, or who gives or lends any assault weapon or any .50 BMG rifle, except as provided by this chapter, is guilty of a felony, and upon conviction shall be punished by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 for four, six, or eight years.

(b) In addition and consecutive to the punishment imposed under subdivision (a), any person who transfers, lends, sells, or gives any assault weapon or any .50 BMG rifle to a minor in violation of subdivision (a) shall receive an enhancement of imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170
 of one year.

(c) Except in the case of a first violation involving not more than two firearms as provided in Sections 30605 and 30610, for purposes of this article, if more than one assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle is involved in any violation of this article, there shall be a distinct and separate offense for each.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 549.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

30605.

(a) Any person who, within this state, possesses any assault weapon, except as provided in this chapter, shall be punished by imprisonment in a county jail for a period not exceeding one year, or by imprisonment pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a first violation of these provisions is punishable by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) if the person was found in possession of no more than two firearms in compliance with Section 30945 and the person meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The person proves that he or she lawfully possessed the assault weapon prior to the date it was defined as an
 assault weapon.

(2) The person has not previously been convicted of a violation of this article.

(3) The person was found to be in possession of the assault weapon within one year following the end of the one-year registration period established pursuant to Section 30900.

(4) The person relinquished the firearm pursuant to Section 31100, in which case the assault weapon shall be destroyed pursuant to Sections 18000 and 18005.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 550.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Amending action operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.   Section operative January 1, 2012, pursuant to Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

30610.

(a) Any person who, within this state, possesses any .50 BMG rifle, except as provided in this chapter, shall be punished by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), imprisonment in a county jail for a period not to exceed one year, or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), a first violation of these provisions is punishable by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) if the person was found in possession of no more than two firearms in compliance with Section 30905 and the person satisfies all of the following conditions:

(1) The person proves that he or she lawfully possessed the .50 BMG
 rifle prior to January 1, 2005.

(2) The person has not previously been convicted of a violation of this article.

(3) The person was found to be in possession of the .50 BMG rifle within one year following the end of the .50 BMG rifle registration period established pursuant to Section 30905.

(c) Firearms seized pursuant to this section from persons who meet all of the conditions in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (b) shall be returned unless the court finds in the interest of public safety, after notice and hearing, that the .50 BMG rifle should be destroyed pursuant to Sections 18000 and 18005. Firearms seized from persons who do not meet the conditions set forth in paragraphs (1), (2), and (3) of subdivision (b) shall be destroyed pursuant to Sections 18000 and 18005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30615.

Notwithstanding Section 654 or any other provision of law, any person who commits another crime while violating this article may receive an additional, consecutive punishment of one year for violating this article, in addition and consecutive to the punishment, including enhancements, which is prescribed for the other crime.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30620.

As used in this chapter, the date a firearm is an assault weapon is the earliest of the following:

(a) The effective date of an amendment to Section 30510 or to former Section 12276 that adds the designation of the specified firearm.

(b) The effective date of the list promulgated pursuant to former Section 12276.5, as that section read in Section 3 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991, which adds or changes the designation of the specified firearm.

(c) January 1, 2000, which was the operative date of former Section 12276.1, as enacted by Section 7 of Chapter 129 of the Statutes of 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30625.

Sections 30600, 30605, and 30610 do not apply to the sale of an assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle to, or the purchase, importation, or possession of an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle by, the Department of Justice, police departments, sheriffs’ offices, marshals’ offices, the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, the Department of the California Highway Patrol, district attorneys’ offices, the Department of Fish and Wildlife, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Department of Cannabis Control, or the military or naval forces of this state or of the United States, or any federal law enforcement agency for use in the discharge of their official duties.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 70, Sec. 108.   (AB 141)   Effective July 12, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

30630.

(a) Sections 30605 and 30610 shall not prohibit the possession or use of assault weapons or a .50 BMG rifle by sworn peace officer members of those agencies specified in Section 30625 for law enforcement purposes, whether on or off duty.

(b) (1) Sections 30600, 30605, and 30610 shall not prohibit the sale, delivery, or transfer of an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle to, or the possession of an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle by, a sworn peace officer member of an agency specified in Section 30625 if the peace officer is authorized by the officer’s employer to possess or receive the assault weapon or the .50 BMG rifle. Required authorization is defined as verifiable
 written certification from the head of the agency, identifying the recipient or possessor of the assault weapon as a peace officer and authorizing that person to receive or possess the specific assault weapon.

(2) For this exemption to apply, in the case of a peace officer who possesses or receives the assault weapon prior to January 1, 2002, the officer shall register the assault weapon on or before April 1, 2002, pursuant to former Section 12285, as it read at any time from when it was enacted by Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989, to and including when it was amended by Section 9 of Chapter 129 of the Statutes of 1999. In the case of a peace officer who possesses or receives the assault weapon on or after January 1, 2002, the officer shall, not later than 90 days after possession or receipt, register the assault weapon pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 30900), or pursuant to former Section 12285, as it read at any
 time from when it was amended by Section 9 of Chapter 129 of the Statutes of 1999 to when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010. In the case of a peace officer who possesses or receives a .50 BMG rifle on or before January 1, 2005, the officer shall register the .50 BMG rifle on or before April 30, 2006. In the case of a peace officer who possesses or receives a .50 BMG rifle after January 1, 2005, the officer shall register the .50 BMG rifle not later than one year after possession or receipt.

(3) With the registration, the peace officer shall include a copy of the authorization required pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit or prohibit the sale, delivery, or transfer of an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle to, or the possession of an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle by, a member of a federal law
 enforcement agency provided that person is authorized by the employing agency to possess the assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30631.

Sections 30600 and 30605 do not apply to the loan of an assault weapon to, nor the possession of an assault weapon by, a person enrolled in the course of basic training prescribed by the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training, or any other course certified by the commission, while engaged in firearms training and being supervised by a firearms instructor, if the following requirements are met:

(a) The loaned assault weapon does not leave the
 training facility.

(b) The enrollee has met the minimum peace officer hiring standards as stated in Sections 1029, 1030, and 1031 of the Government Code prior to entry to the course and is currently employed by any of the following:

(1) A police department or sheriff’s office.

(2) A marshal’s office.

(3) The Department of
 Justice.

(4) The Department of the California Highway Patrol.

(5) The Department of Fish and Wildlife.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 235, Sec. 1.   (AB 355)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

30635.

Section 30605 shall not apply to the possession of an assault weapon during the 90-day period immediately after the date it was specified as an assault weapon pursuant to former Section 12276.5, as that section read in Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989, Section 1 of Chapter 874 of the Statutes of 1990, or Section 3 of Chapter 954 of the Statutes of 1991, or during the one-year period after the date it was defined as an assault weapon pursuant to former Section 12276.1, as that section read at any time from when it was enacted by Section 7 of Chapter 129 of the Statutes of 1999 to when it was repealed by the Deadly Weapons Recodification Act of 2010, if all of the following are applicable:

(a) At the
 time of the possession in question, the person was eligible under the then-applicable version of former Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 12275) of Title 2 of Part 4 to register the particular assault weapon.

(b) The person lawfully possessed the particular assault weapon prior to the date it was specified as an assault weapon pursuant to former Section 12276.5, or prior to the date it was defined as an assault weapon pursuant to former Section 12276.1.

(c) At the time of the possession in question, the person was otherwise in compliance with the then-applicable version of former Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 12275) of Title 2 of Part 4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30640.

Section 30610 shall not apply to the possession of a .50 BMG rifle, which was not defined or specified as an assault weapon pursuant to the then-applicable version of the former Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 12275) of Title 2 of Part 4 that was added to this code by Section 3 of Chapter 19 of the Statutes of 1989, by any person prior to May 1, 2006, if all of the following are applicable:

(a) At the time of the possession in question, the person was eligible under the then-applicable version of former Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 12275) of Title 2 of Part 4 to register that .50 BMG rifle.

(b) The person lawfully possessed the .50 BMG
 rifle prior to January 1, 2005.

(c) At the time of the possession in question, the person was otherwise in compliance with the then-applicable version of former Chapter 2.3 (commencing with Section 12275) of Title 2 of Part 4.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30645.

Sections 30600, 30605, and 30610 shall not apply to the manufacture by any person who is issued a permit pursuant to Section 31005 of assault weapons or .50 BMG rifles for sale to the following:

(a) Exempt entities listed in Section 30625.

(b) Entities and persons who have been issued permits pursuant to Section 31000 or 31005.

(c) Federal military and law enforcement agencies.

(d) Law enforcement and military agencies of other states.

(e) Foreign governments
 and agencies approved by the United States State Department.

(f) Entities outside the state who have, in effect, a federal firearms dealer’s license solely for the purpose of distribution to an entity listed in subdivisions (c) to (e), inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30650.

Sections 30600, 30605, and 30610 shall not apply to the sale of assault weapons or .50 BMG rifles by persons who are issued permits pursuant to Section 31005 to any of the following:

(a) Exempt entities listed in Section 30625.

(b) Entities and persons who have been issued permits pursuant to Section 31000 or 31005.

(c) Federal military and law enforcement agencies.

(d) Law enforcement and military agencies of other states.

(e) Foreign governments and agencies
 approved by the United States State Department.

(f) Officers described in Section 30630 who are authorized to possess assault weapons or .50 BMG rifles pursuant to Section 30630.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30655.

(a) Section 30600 shall not apply to a person who is the executor or administrator of an estate that includes an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle registered under Article 5 (commencing with Section 30900) or that was possessed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30630 that is disposed of as authorized by the probate court, if the disposition is otherwise permitted by this chapter.

(b) Sections 30605 and 30610 shall not apply to a person who is the executor or administrator of an estate that includes an assault weapon or a .50 BMG rifle registered under Article 5 (commencing with Section 30900) or that was possessed pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 30630, if the assault weapon or .50
 BMG rifle is possessed at a place set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 30945 or as authorized by the probate court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 711, Sec. 6.   (SB 1080)   Effective January 1, 2011.   Operative January 1, 2012, by Sec. 10 of Ch. 711.)
-------------------------------------------

30660.

(a) Section 30600 shall not apply to a person who lawfully possesses and has registered an assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle pursuant to this chapter who lends that assault weapon or .50 BMG rifle to another person, if all the following requirements are satisfied:
